Colorado statutes. TITLE 19 Children's Code
PART 4
PREVENTION PROGRAMS FUNDED
THROUGH STATE AGENCIES

19-1-401 to 19-1-403. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2000:
Entire part repealed, p. 585, § 9, effective May 18.

Editor's note:
This part 4 was added in 1999 and was not amended prior to its repeal in 2000. For the text of this part 4 prior to 2000, consult the 1999 Colorado Revised Statutes.